Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.18
Special party bus license.

(1) The commission may issue a license to any person providing special party bus service under a certificate of public convenience and necessity granted by the Public Service Commission when the person allows the consumption of alcoholic liquor in its special party bus by an individual who is twenty-one years of age or older. Each licensee shall keep a duplicate of such license in each special party bus where such alcoholic liquor is consumed.

(2) Each license shall expire on April 30 of each year. Each license shall be good throughout this state as a state license. Only one license shall be required for all special party buses operated in this state by the same owner. No further license shall be required or tax levied by any county, city, or village for the privilege of allowing consumption of alcoholic liquor in such buses.

Laws 2020, LB734, § 6.